test/src/morphology/N-kul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuļ: # Noun 103 'eng /est kull/fin' - full paradigm
     kuļ+N+Sg+Nom: kuļ
     kuļ+N+Sg+Gen: kuļ
     kuļ+N+Sg+Par: kuļļõ
     kuļ+N+Sg+Dat: kuļļõn
     kuļ+N+Sg+Ins: kuļļõks
     kuļ+N+Sg+Ill: kuļļõ
     kuļ+N+Sg+Ela: kuļštõ
     kuļ+N+Pl+Nom: kūļ
     kuļ+N+Pl+Gen: kūļõd
     kuļ+N+Pl+Par: kūļidi
     kuļ+N+Pl+Dat: kūļõdõn
     kuļ+N+Pl+Ins: kūļõdõks
     kuļ+N+Pl+Ill: kūļiž
     kuļ+N+Pl+Ela: kūļist
